Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2219
Oath, affirmation, or statement on filed documents; perjury; penalty.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this code or by rule, every document filed with the court under this code including applications, petitions, and demands for notice, shall be deemed to include an oath, affirmation, or statement to the effect that its representations are true as far as the person executing or filing it knows or is informed. Any person who willfully falsifies any such representation shall be guilty of perjury and shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished as provided by section 28-915.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 19, UPC § 1-310;

Laws 1978, LB 748, § 25.